Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 7. Miscellaneous.

Sec. 21.84.625.
Service of process.

A society authorized to do business in this state shall appoint in writing the director and the director’s successors in office to be its true and lawful attorney upon whom all lawful process in an action or proceeding against it shall be served. The society shall agree in writing that any lawful process against it that is served on the appointed attorney is of the same legal force and validity as if served on the society and that the authority continues in force so long as any liability remains outstanding in this state. Copies of the appointment, certified by the director, are sufficient evidence of the appointment and shall be admitted in evidence with the same force and effect as the original.

Service may only be made on the director or, if the director is absent, upon the person in charge of the director’s office. Service shall be made in duplicate and shall constitute sufficient service on the society. When legal process against a society is served on the director, the director shall immediately forward one of the duplicate copies by registered mail, prepaid, to the secretary or corresponding officer. Legal process shall not be served on a society except in the manner provided in this section. At the time of serving a process on the director, the plaintiff or complainant in the action shall pay to the director a fee set under AS

21.06.250

.

A society shall respond to the service of process as provided in the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

(§ 33 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.650.
Penalties.

A person who knowingly makes a false or fraudulent statement or representation in or with reference to an application for membership, or for the purpose of obtaining money from or a benefit in a society, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $2,500 and is liable for a civil penalty of three times the amount received by the violator as compensation or commission. A civil penalty may be sued for and recovered by the aggrieved person or society for the person’s or society’s own use and benefit.

A person who makes a false sworn statement in a report or declaration required or authorized by this chapter or in a statement concerning the death or disability of an insured for the purpose of obtaining payment of a benefit named in the certificate and who does not believe the statement to be true is guilty of perjury and, upon conviction, is subject to the penalties prescribed by law for perjury under AS

11.56.200

.

A person who solicits membership for, or in any manner assists in procuring membership in, a society not licensed to do business in this state is guilty of a violation and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 or more than $200.

A person who knowingly engages in conduct that constitutes a violation of the provisions of this chapter for which a penalty is not otherwise prescribed is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $2,500.

In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 33 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.675.
Review.

Decisions and findings of the director made under the provisions of this chapter are subject to review by proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction in this state.

History.

(§ 33 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.700.
Exemption of certain societies.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to affect or apply to

grand or subordinate lodges of societies, orders, or associations doing business in this state that provide benefits exclusively through local or subordinate lodges;

societies, orders, or associations that admit to membership only persons engaged in one or more crafts or hazardous occupations, in the same or similar lines of business, and that insure only members and families of the society, order, or association, and the ladies’ societies or ladies’ auxiliaries of the societies, orders, or associations;

domestic societies that limit their membership to employees of a particular city or town, designated firm, business house, or corporation and that provide for death benefits of not more than $400 or health care benefits of not more than $350 to a person in one year, or both; or

domestic societies or associations of a purely religious, charitable, or benevolent description that provide for death benefits of not more than $350 or health care benefits of not more than $350 to a person in one year, or both.

A society or association described in (a)(3) or (4) of this section that provides for death or health care benefits for which benefit certificates are issued and a society or association described in (a)(4) of this section that has more than 1,000 members are not exempt from the provisions of this chapter but shall comply with the requirements of this chapter.

A society that, by the provisions of this section, is exempt from the requirements of this chapter, except a society described in (a)(2) of this section, may not give or allow or promise to give or allow to a person compensation for procuring new members.

A society that provides benefits for health care or death resulting solely from accident and that does not obligate itself to pay natural death or health care benefits has all of the privileges and is subject to all the applicable provisions and regulations of this chapter, except that the provisions of this chapter relating to medical examination, evaluations of benefit certificates, and incontestability do not apply to the society.

The director may require a society or association to provide, by examination or otherwise, information that will enable the director to determine whether the society or association is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

Societies that are exempt from the provisions of this chapter under the provisions of this section shall also be exempt from all other provisions of the insurance laws of this state.

History.

(§ 33 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“alien society” means a society formed under the laws other than those of the United States of America, its states, territories, or the District of Columbia;

“benefit contract” means the agreement for provision of benefits authorized by AS

21.84.201

, as that agreement is described in AS

21.84.255(a)

;

“benefit member” means an adult member who is designated by the laws or rules of the society to be a benefit member under a benefit contract;

“certificate” means the document issued as written evidence of the benefit contract;

“domestic society” means a society formed under the laws of this state;

“foreign society” means a society formed under the laws of another state, a territory belonging to the United States of America, or the District of Columbia;

“fraternal benefit society” means an incorporated society, order, or supreme lodge, without capital stock, including one exempted under AS

21.84.700(a)(2)

, whether incorporated or not, that is conducted solely for the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries and not for profit, that is operated on a lodge system with ritualistic form of work, that has a representative form of government, and that makes provision for the payment of benefits under this chapter;

“laws” means the society’s articles of incorporation, constitution, and bylaws, however designated;

“lodge” means subordinate member units of the society known as camps, courts, councils, branches, or another designation;

“lodge system” means a society having a supreme governing body and subordinate lodges into which members are elected, initiated, or admitted under its laws, ritual, and rules; subordinate lodges are required by the laws of the society to hold regular meetings at least once in each month in furtherance of the purposes of the society;

“premiums” means rates, dues, or other required contribution by whatever name known that are payable under the certificate;

“rules” means all rules, regulations, or resolutions adopted by the supreme governing body or board of directors that are intended to have general application to the members of the society;

“society,” unless otherwise indicated, means a fraternal benefit society.

History.

(§ 215 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 34, 35 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Renumbered in 1997 to maintain alphabetical organization.